Wisconsin, session 2025, SB937.
do enact as follows:SB937,11Section 1. 100.85 of the statutes is created to read:SB937,2,22100.85 App stores and app developers. (1) Definitions. In this section:SB937,2,43(a) “Account holder,” with respect to an app store, means an individual 4associated with a mobile device.SB937,2,55(b) “Age category” means any of the following:SB937,2,661. The category “child,” which comprises individuals under 13 years of age.SB937,2,872. The category “younger teenager,” which comprises individuals at least 13 8years of age but under 16 years of age.SB937,2,1093. The category “older teenager,” which comprises individuals at least 16 10years of age but under 18 years of age.SB937,2,12114. The category “adult,” which comprises individuals who are at least 18 years 12of age.SB937,2,1413(c) “Age category data” means information about an account holder's age 14category that is collected by an app store provider and is shared with a developer.SB937,2,1615(d) “Age rating” means a classification that indicates the suitability of an 16app’s content and functions for different age groups.SB937,2,1817(e) “App” means a software application or electronic service that an individual 18may run or direct on a mobile device, including a pre-installed app.SB937,2,2119(f) “App store” means a publicly available website, software application, or 20electronic service that an account holder may use to download an app from a 3rd-21party developer onto a mobile device.SB937,2,2422(g) “App store provider” means a person that owns, operates, or controls an 23app store that an account holder in this state may use to download an app onto a 24mobile device.SB937,3,21(h) “Content description” means a description of the specific content elements 2or functions that informed an app's age rating.SB937,3,43(i) “Developer” means a person that owns or controls an app that is available 4for download from an app store or that is pre-installed onto a mobile device.SB937,3,65(j) “Knowingly” means to act with actual knowledge or to act with knowledge 6fairly inferred based on objective circumstances.SB937,3,87(k) “Minor” means an individual under 18 years of age unless the individual is 8married or an emancipated minor, as defined in s. 48.375 (2) (e).SB937,3,109(L) “Minor account” means an account with an app store provider that, subject 10to the requirement under sub. (2) (b) 1., is established by a minor.SB937,3,1411(m) “Mobile device” means a phone or general-purpose tablet that provides 12cellular or wireless connectivity, is capable of connecting to the Internet, runs a 13mobile operating system, and is capable of running an app on its mobile operating 14system.SB937,3,1615(n) “Mobile operating system” means software loaded onto a mobile device 16that does all of the following:SB937,3,17171. Manages the mobile device’s hardware resources.SB937,3,18182. Provides common services for mobile device programs.SB937,3,19193. Controls memory allocation on the mobile device.SB937,3,20204. Provides interfaces for apps to access the functionality of the mobile device.SB937,3,2121(o) “Parent” means, with respect to a minor, any of the following:SB937,3,22221. A parent, as defined in s. 46.56 (1) (j).SB937,3,23232. An individual reasonably believed to be a parent under subd. 1.SB937,4,424(p) “Parent account” means an account with an app store provider that is 1verified to be established by an individual who the app store provider has 2determined, through its age verification methods, is at least 18 years old, married, 3or an emancipated minor, as defined in s. 48.375 (2) (e). A “parent account” may be 4affiliated with a minor account.SB937,4,65(q) “Parental consent disclosure” means disclosing all of the following 6information:SB937,4,871. If an app store provider has an age rating for an app or in-app purchase, the 8age rating for the app or in-app purchase.SB937,4,1092. If an app store provider has a content description for an app or in-app 10purchase, the content description for the app or in-app purchase.SB937,4,12113. A description of the personal data collected by an app from an account 12holder and the personal data shared by the app with a 3rd party.SB937,4,14134. If personal data is collected by an app, the methods implemented by the 14developer to protect the personal data.SB937,4,2315(r) “Pre-installed app” means any app, or portion of any app, that is present on 16a mobile device at the time of purchase, initial activation, or first use by a consumer, 17including browsers, search engines, and messaging apps, but excluding core 18operating system functions, essential device drivers, and apps necessary for basic 19device operation such as phone settings and emergency services apps. “Pre-20installed apps” include apps, or portions of apps, installed or partially installed by 21the device manufacturer, wireless service provider, retailer, or any other party prior 22to purchase, initial activation, or first use by the consumer that may be later 23updated.SB937,5,21(s) “Significant change” means a material modification to an app’s terms of 2service or privacy policy that does any of the following:SB937,5,431. Materially changes the categories of data collected, stored, or shared by the 4app.SB937,5,552. Materially alters the age rating or content description for the app.SB937,5,763. Materially introduces in-app purchases in circumstances in which no in-7app purchases were previously present.SB937,5,984. Materially introduces advertisements through the app in circumstances in 9which no advertisements were previously present.SB937,5,1110(t) “Verifiable parental consent” means authorization that satisfies all of the 11following:SB937,5,12121. Is provided by a parent account. Down Down /2025/related/proposals/sb937 true proposaltext /2025/related/proposals/sb937 proposaltext/2025/REG/SB937 proposaltext/2025/REG/SB937 section true Menu»2025»Related Documents»Proposal Text»SB937: Bill Text × Details for PDF view Link (Permanent link) Bookmark this location View toggle Go to top of document Search in this chapter Search in this section Search in this agency Search in this chapter group Search in this chapter Search in this section Cross references for section Acts affecting this section References to this 1970 Statutes Annotations Appellate Court Citations Administrative Code Index Reference lines Clear highlighting